Utah statutes.
3-1-16.   Removal of officer.
Any member may bring charges of misconduct or incompetency against an officer
by filing them with the secretary or president of the association, together
with a petition signed by 10 per centum of the members requesting the removal
of the officer in question. The directors shall vote upon the removal of the
officer at the first meeting of the board held after the hearing on the
charges, and the officer may be removed by a majority vote, notwithstanding
any contract the officer may have with the association, which shall terminate
upon his removal, anything in the contract to the contrary notwithstanding.
The officer against whom such charges are made shall be served with a copy of
the charges not less than 10 days prior to the meeting, and shall have an
opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person and by counsel, and to
present evidence, and the persons making the charges shall have the same
opportunity.
